District of Columbia statutes.
21-152

Terms of sale; lien.

A sale pursuant to a decree issued pursuant to section 21-151 may be made upon such terms as to cash and credit as the court directs, and a lien shall be retained on the property sold for the purchase money.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 743, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 21-152.
1973 Ed., § 21-152.